Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-533
Enlarged district; trustees; salary.

The trustees shall each receive as his salary the sum of seven hundred dollars per annum, payable quarterly.

Laws 1919, c. 240, § 10, p. 1003;

Laws 1921, c. 108, § 1, p. 382;

C.S.1922, § 1889;

C.S.1929, § 31-627;

R.S.1943, § 31-533;

Laws 1953, c. 100, § 1, p. 277.